Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-507
State Fire Marshal; records and statistics on fires required.

The State Fire Marshal shall keep in his office a record by alphabetical index, name of town, and by county and precinct in all unincorporated territory, of all the fires occurring in the state, together with all facts, statistics and circumstances, including the cause and origin of the fires, which may be determined by the investigation provided by section 81-506. Such reports and statistics shall be at all times open to public inspection.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 6, p. 480;

C.S.1929, § 81-5506;

R.S.1943, § 81-507.